Montana, session 2025, SB504.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Definitions. For the purposes of [sections 1 through 5], the following
definitions apply:
(1) "Homeless" has the meaning provided in 24 CFR 578.3 as it read on January 31, 2025.
(2) "Permanent supportive housing" means a multifamily housing complex that provides:
(a) long-term leasing and rental housing to persons earning 60% or less of the area median
income and who are currently homeless or are at risk of becoming homeless; and
(b) onsite, voluntary support services to address the needs of persons experiencing chronic
homelessness, which may include but are not limited to:
(i) behavioral and mental health therapy services;
(ii) addiction and recovery support services;
(iii) independent living support services;
(iv) services to aid in securing employment; and
(v) medical and dental services.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Permanent supportive housing development account -- use. (1)
There is a permanent supportive housing account within the state special revenue fund provided for in 17-2-102
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 504

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 504.1
to provide grant funding to nonprofit corporations that intend to construct or rehabilitate a structure for use as
permanent supportive housing. The department of commerce shall administer the account.
(2) The department may use up to 3% of the funds allocated to the account for administrative
costs.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Permanent supportive housing development grants authorization.
(1) The department of commerce is authorized to make up to $75 million in grants to nonprofit corporations for
property acquisition, construction, space acquisition, remodeling, repairs, and the purchase of appliances and
equipment. The grants authorized in this section are subject to the conditions set forth in [section 5].
(2) The department of commerce must receive proposals from nonprofit corporations for
permanent supportive housing projects.
(3) Funding for projects may be provided only as long as there are sufficient funds available from
the amount that was deposited or transferred into the permanent supportive housing development account
established in [section 2]. Funding for these projects must be made available in the order that the grant
recipients satisfy the grant conditions described in [section 5].

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Eligibility -- submission deadline -- priority -- guidelines. (1) A
nonprofit corporation may apply to the department of commerce for permanent supportive housing development
grants under [section 3].
(2) Nonprofit corporations shall submit grant applications to the department of commerce in order
to be eligible for funding under [section 3].
(3) The department of commerce is authorized to adopt guidelines necessary to implement
[sections 1 through 5].

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Grant conditions -- disbursement of funds. (1) The disbursement of
grant funds for the projects chosen by the department of commerce pursuant to [section 3] is subject to the
following conditions:
(a) the grant recipient shall execute a grant agreement with the department of commerce that
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 504

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 504.1
includes a project management plan and reporting requirements to track the outcomes of allocated grants; and
(b) the grant recipient shall satisfy other specific requirements considered necessary by the
department of commerce to accomplish the purpose of the project as evidenced by the application to the
department of commerce.
(2) Projects must adhere to the design standards required by applicable regulations. Recipients of
program funds for projects that are not subject to any design standards shall comply with generally accepted
industry standards.
(3) If actual project expenses are lower than the projected expense of the project, the department
of commerce shall reduce the amount of grant funds to be provided to grant recipients.

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Transfer of funds. Within 15 days of [the effective date of this act], the
state treasurer shall transfer the following amounts into the fund provided for in [section 2]:
(1) $50 million from the general fund; and
(2) $25 million from the behavioral health system for future generations fund established in 50-1-
119.

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 504